California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) The death or incapacitating illness of a party, a representative or attorney of a party, a witness to an essential fact, or of the parent, child, or member of the household of that person, when it is not feasible to substitute another representative, attorney, or witness because of the proximity of the hearing date.

(2) Lack of notice of hearing as provided in Section 11509 of the Government Code.

(3) A material change in the status of the case where a change in the parties or pleadings requires postponement, or an executed settlement or stipulated findings of fact obviate the need for hearing. A partial amendment of the pleadings shall not be good cause for continuance to the extent that the unamended portion of the pleadings is ready to be heard.

(4) A stipulation for continuance signed by all parties or their authorized representatives that is communicated with the request for continuance to the administrative law judge no later than 25 business days before the hearing.

(5) The substitution of the representative or attorney of a party upon showing that the
 substitution is required.

(6) The unavailability of a party, representative, or attorney of a party, or witness to an essential fact due to a conflicting and required appearance in a judicial matter if when the hearing date was set, the person did not know and could neither anticipate nor at any time avoid the conflict, and the conflict with request for continuance is immediately communicated to the administrative law judge.

(7) The unavailability of a party, a representative or attorney of a party, or a material witness due to an unavoidable emergency.

(8) Failure by a party to comply with a timely discovery request if the continuance request is made by the party who requested the discovery.

(d) In addition to the witness fees and mileage provided by
 Section 11450.40 of the Government Code, the department may pay actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses in an amount not to exceed the per diem allowance payable to a nonrepresented state employee on travel status. The department may pay witness expenses in advance of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.6.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services may prohibit a vendor from employing, or continuing the employment of, or allowing in a family home, or allowing contact with any adult with a developmental disability placed in a family home by, any employee or prospective employee, who has been denied an exemption to work or to be present in a facility, when that person has been convicted of a crime, except a minor traffic violation.

(b) The employee or prospective employee,
 and the vendor shall be given written notice of the basis of the department’s action and of the employee’s or prospective employee’s right to a hearing. The notice shall be served either by personal service or by registered mail. Within 15 days after the department serves the notice, the employee or prospective employee may file with the department a written request for a hearing. If the employee or prospective employee fails to file a written request for a hearing within the prescribed time, the department’s action shall be final.

(c) (1) The department may require the immediate exclusion of an employee or prospective employee from a family home agency or family home pending a final decision of the matter, when, in the opinion of the director, the action is necessary to protect any adult with a developmental disability placed in the family home from physical or mental abuse, abandonment, or any other substantial threat to
 his or her health and safety.

(2) If the department requires the immediate exclusion of an employee or prospective employee from a family home agency or family home, the department shall serve an order of immediate exclusion upon the employee or prospective employee that shall notify the employee or prospective employee of the basis of the department’s action and of the employee’s or prospective employee’s right to a hearing.

(3) Within 15 days after the department serves an order of immediate exclusion, the employee or prospective employee may file a written request for a hearing with the department. The department’s action shall be final if the employee or prospective employee does not file a request for a hearing within the prescribed time. The department shall do the following upon receipt of a written request for a hearing:

(A) Within 80 days of receipt of the request for a hearing, serve an accusation upon the employee or prospective employee.

(B) Within 60 days of receipt of a notice of defense by the employee or prospective employee pursuant to Section 11506 of the Government Code, conduct a hearing on the statement of issues.

(4) An order of immediate exclusion of the employee or prospective employee from the family home agency or family home shall remain in effect until the hearing is completed and the director has made a final determination on the merits. However, the order of immediate exclusion shall be deemed vacated if the director fails to make a final determination on the merits within 60 days after the original hearing has been completed.

(d) An employee or prospective employee who files a written request for a
 hearing with the department pursuant to this section shall, as part of the written request, provide his or her current mailing address. The employee or prospective employee shall subsequently notify the department in writing of any change in mailing address, until the hearing process has been completed or terminated.

(e) Hearings held pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The standard of proof shall be the preponderance of the evidence and the burden of proof shall be on the department.

(f) The department may institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against an employee or prospective employee upon any ground provided by this section, or enter an order prohibiting the employee’s or prospective employee’s employment or presence in the family home
 agency or family home or otherwise take disciplinary action against the employee or prospective employee, notwithstanding any resignation, withdrawal of employment application, or change of duties by the employee or prospective employee, or any discharge, failure to hire, or reassignment of the employee or prospective employee by the vendor.

(g) A vendor’s failure to comply with the department’s prohibition of employment or presence in the family home agency or family home shall be grounds for disciplining the vendor pursuant to Section 4689.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1095, Sec. 12.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.7.

(a) For the 1998–99 fiscal year, levels of payment for supported living service providers that are vendored pursuant to Section 4689 shall be increased based on the amount appropriated in this section for the purpose of increasing the salary, wage, and benefits for direct care workers providing supported living services.

(b) The sum of five million fifty-seven thousand dollars ($5,057,000) is hereby appropriated in augmentation of the appropriations made in the Budget Act of
 1998 to implement this section as follows:

(1) The sum of two million four hundred five thousand dollars ($2,405,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Health Services in augmentation of the appropriation made in Item 4260-101-0001.

(2) The sum of two million five hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($2,551,000) is hereby appropriated from the Federal Trust Fund to the State Department of Health Services in augmentation of the appropriation made in Item 4260-101-0890.

(3) The sum of one hundred one thousand dollars ($101,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Developmental Services in augmentation of the appropriation made in Item 4300-101-0001, scheduled as follows: 10.10—Regional Centers(b) 10.10.020 Purchase of Services$5,057,000(e) Reimbursements−$4,956,000(c) By July 1, 2002, in consultation with stakeholder organizations, the department shall establish by regulation, an equitable and cost-effective methodology for the determination of supported living costs and a methodology of payment for providers of supported living services. The
 methodology shall consider the special needs of persons with developmental disabilities and the quality of services to be provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 48.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.8.

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2008:

(a) No regional center may pay an existing supported living service provider, for services where rates are determined through a negotiation between the regional center and the provider, a rate higher than the rate in effect on June 30, 2008, unless the increase is required by a contract between the regional center and the vendor that is in effect on June 30, 2008, or the regional center demonstrates that the approval is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety and the department has granted prior written authorization.

(b) No regional center may negotiate a rate with a new supported living service provider, for services where rates are determined through a negotiation between the regional center and the provider, that is higher than the regional center’s median rate for the same service code and unit of service, or the statewide median rate for the same service code and unit of service, whichever is lower. The unit of service designation shall conform with an existing regional center designation or, if none exists, a designation used to calculate the statewide median rate for the same service. The regional center shall annually certify to the State Department of Developmental Services its median rate for each negotiated rate service code, by designated unit of service. This certification shall be subject to verification through the department’s biennial fiscal audit of the regional center.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2016, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the rates in effect on June 30, 2016, for supported living services, as defined in Subchapter 19 of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be increased by 5 percent. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 5.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.9.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to establish that hourly workers providing supported living services to individuals served by regional centers have a right to overtime compensation for all hours worked over 40 hours per workweek.

(b) Notwithstanding any other state or federal law or regulation concerning overtime pay, including but not limited to, federal regulations implementing the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.), hourly workers who provide supported living services, as defined in Section 54302(a)(71) of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, to individuals served by regional centers, as defined in Section 54302(a)(54) of Title 17 of the California Code of
 Regulations, and who are employed by a vendor, as defined in Section 54302(a)(74) of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be compensated for overtime at the rate of one and one-half times the employee’s regular rate of pay for all hours worked over 40 hours per workweek. Unless a vendor specifies otherwise, a workweek is defined as beginning at 12:00 a.m. on Sunday and terminating at 11:59 p.m. the following Saturday.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 39.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Regional Center Rates for Nonresidential Services [4690. - 4694.]

4690.

The Director of Developmental Services shall establish, maintain, and revise, as necessary, an equitable process for setting rates of state payment for nonresidential services purchased by regional centers, and may promulgate regulations establishing program standards, or the process to be used for setting these rates, or both, in order to assure that regional centers may secure high-quality services for developmentally disabled persons from individuals or agencies vendored to provide these services. In developing the rates pursuant to regulation, the director may require vendors to submit program, cost, or other information, as necessary. The director shall take into account the rates paid by other agencies and jurisdictions for comparable services in order to assure that regional center rates are at competitive levels. In no event shall rates established pursuant to this article be any less than those established for comparable services under the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1396, Sec. 2.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4690.1.

(a) By March 1, 1986, the department, in consultation with representatives of regional centers and providers of transportation services to regional center clients, shall develop a cost statement to be used in setting rates for providers of transportation services.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department may develop alternative procedures for establishing rates for providers of transportation services, including, but not limited to, a noncompetitive process and a competitive process for use by regional centers in which rates of reimbursement are established based on contract bids or proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 973, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4690.2.

(a) The Director of Developmental Services shall develop program standards and establish, maintain, and revise, as necessary, an equitable process for setting rates of state payment, based upon those standards, for in-home respite services purchased by regional centers from agencies vendored to provide these services. The Director of Developmental Services may promulgate regulations establishing these standards and the process to be used for setting rates. “In-home respite services” means intermittent or regularly scheduled temporary nonmedical care and supervision provided in the client’s own home, for a regional center client who resides with a family member. These services are designed to do all of the following:

(1) Assist family members in maintaining the client at home.

(2) Provide appropriate care and supervision to ensure the client’s safety in the absence of family members.

(3) Relieve family members from the constantly demanding responsibility of caring for the client.

(4) Attend to the client’s basic self-help needs and other activities of daily living including interaction, socialization, and continuation of usual daily routines which would ordinarily be performed by the family members.

(b) The provisions of subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive, of Section 4691 and subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, and subdivision (h) of Section 4691.5 applicable to community-based day programs, shall also apply to in-home respite service vendors for the
 purpose of establishing standards and an equitable process for setting rates, except:

(1) The process specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4691.5 for increasing rates for fiscal year 1990–91 shall apply only to the administrative portion of the rate for eligible in-home respite service vendors, and the amount of funds available for this increase shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) of the total amount appropriated for rate increases. The administrative portion of the rate shall consist of the in-home respite service vendor’s allowable costs, other than those for respite worker’s salary, wage, benefits, and travel. Vendors eligible for this rate increase shall include only those in-home respite service vendors which received a deficiency adjustment in their permanent or provisional rate for fiscal year 1989–90, as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4691.5.

(2) In addition, a rate increase shall also be provided for fiscal year 1990–91, for the salary, wage, and benefit portion of the rate for in-home respite service vendors eligible for the increase. The amount of funds available for this rate increase is limited to the remaining funds appropriated for this paragraph and paragraph (1) for fiscal year 1990–91. The amount of increase which each eligible in-home respite service vendor shall receive shall be limited to the amount necessary to increase the salary, wage, and benefit portion of the rate for respite workers to five dollars and six cents ($5.06) per hour in salary and wages plus ninety-five cents ($0.95) in benefits. Vendors eligible for this increase shall include only those in-home respite service vendors whose salary, wage, and benefit portion of their existing provisional or permanent rate, as established by the department for respite workers is below the amounts specified in this
 paragraph, and the vendor agrees to reimburse its respite workers at no less than these amounts during fiscal year 1990–91 and thereafter. In order to establish rates pursuant to this paragraph, existing programs receiving a permanent or provisional rate shall submit to the department, the program, cost, and other information specified by the department for either the 1988 calendar year, or for the 1988–89 fiscal year. The specified information shall be submitted on forms developed by the department, not later than 45 days following receipt of the required forms from the department, after the effective date of this section. Programs which fail to submit the required information within the time specified shall have payment of their permanent or provisional rate suspended until the required information has been submitted.

(3) Effective July 1, 1990, and pursuant to the rate methodology developed by the department, the administrative portion and
 the salary, wage, and benefit portion of the rates for in-home respite service vendors currently receiving a provisional or permanent rate shall be combined and paid as a single rate.

(4) Rate increases for fiscal year 1990–91 shall be limited to those specified in paragraphs (1) and (2). For fiscal year 1991–92 and all succeeding fiscal years, the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 4691, which specify that any rate increases shall be subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds in the Budget Act, shall also apply to rates for in-home respite service vendors.

(5) For the 1998–99 fiscal year, an in-home respite service vendor shall receive rate increases pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 4691.5. Any rate increase shall be subject to the appropriation of funds pursuant to the Budget Act.

(6) The rate
 methodology developed by the department may include a supplemental amount of reimbursement for travel costs of respite workers using their private vehicles to and from and between respite sites. The supplemental amount shall be the minimum rate for travel reimbursement for state employees.

(c) In accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 4629.5, each regional center shall include on its Internet Web site the purchase of service policies. For respite services, a regional center shall also include any procedures and assessment tools used by the regional center to determine the level of services needed by each consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 50, Sec. 4.   (SB 853)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4690.3.

(a) For the 1998–99 fiscal year, rates for in-home respite services agencies that are vendored pursuant to Section 4690.2 and the department’s regulations to provide in-home respite services shall be increased based on the amount appropriated in the Budget Act of 1998 for the purpose of increasing the salary, wage, and benefit portion of the rate for in-home respite services workers. Agencies shall reimburse their respite workers at no less than the increased amount in their rate for the 1998–99 fiscal year and thereafter.

(b) For the 1998–99 fiscal years an individual who provides in-home respite services, pursuant to vendorization pursuant to the department’s regulations, shall also receive a rate increase pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 42.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4690.4.

(a) Sections 4690.2, 4691, and 4691.5, which relate to in-home respite service agencies and community-based day programs, shall apply in the 1998–99 fiscal year with the following exceptions:

(1) The 1997–98 fiscal year allowable costs and consumer attendance data submitted to the department by September 30, 1998, shall not be utilized by the department to determine a new mean rate and allowable range of rates, pursuant to regulations, but may be used only in developing a new rate system.

(2) The allowable range of rates and mean rate established for the 1997–98 fiscal year shall be continued.

(3) The rate for new programs shall be the mean rate determined for the same type of program and staff-to-consumer ratio for the 1997–98 fiscal year.

(b) The department shall, in consultation with stakeholder organizations, develop performance based consumer outcome rate systems for community-based day programs and in-home respite services. If rates for community-based day programs are increased in the 1998–99 fiscal year pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (e) of Section 4691.5, and rates for in-home respite services are increased in the 1998–99 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 4690.2, as added by the act adding this section to the Welfare and Institutions Code, then effective September 1, 1998, and until such time as the new rate systems are implemented, or unless funds are otherwise appropriated for rate adjustments, rates shall be frozen.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 43.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4690.5.

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2016, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the rate for family member-provided respite services authorized by the department and in effect on June 30, 2016, and the rates for out-of-home respite services in effect on June 30, 2016, shall be increased by 5 percent. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 26, Sec. 13.   (AB 1606)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4690.7.

A provider of nonresidential services, as defined in paragraph (49) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, may utilize Alternative Nonresidential Services, as authorized in the department’s Directive 01-083120 (August 31, 2020), if needed, to meet a consumer’s service needs, until December 31, 2022. When providing services to consumers, providers shall be creative, resourceful, and make modifications as needed to how existing services are delivered. Any Alternative Nonresidential Services used shall be responsive to each consumer’s current needs, and be mindful of the importance of safety during the COVID-19 pandemic, including compliance with applicable state and local health orders and licensing requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 27.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.

(a) The Legislature reaffirms its intent that community-based day programs be planned and provided as part of a continuum of services to enable persons with developmental disabilities to approximate the pattern of everyday living available to people of the same age without disabilities. The Legislature further intends that standards be developed to ensure high-quality services, and that equitable ratesetting procedures based upon those standards be established, maintained, and revised, as necessary. The Legislature intends that ratesetting procedures be developed for all community-based day programs, which include adult development centers, activity centers, infant day programs, behavior management programs, social recreational programs, and independent living programs.

(b) For the purpose of ensuring that regional centers may secure high-quality services for persons with developmental disabilities, the State Department of Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations establishing program standards and an equitable process for setting rates of state payment for community-based day programs. These regulations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The standards and requirements related to the operation of the program including, but not limited to, staff qualifications, staff-to-client ratios, client entrance and exit criteria, program design, program evaluation, program and client records and documentation, client placement, and personnel requirements and functions.

(2) The allowable cost components of the program including salary and wages, staff benefits,
 operating expenses, and management organization costs where two or more programs are operated by a separate and distinct corporation or entity.

(3) The rate determination processes for establishing rates, based on the allowable costs of the allowable cost components. Different rate determination processes may be developed for establishing rates for new and existing programs, and for the initial and subsequent years of implementation of the regulations. The processes shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The procedure for identification and grouping of programs by type of day program and approved staff-to-client ratio.

(B) The requirements for an identification of the program, cost, and other information, if any, which the program is required to submit to the department or the regional
 center, the consequences, if any, for failure to do so, and the timeframes and format for submission and review.

(C) The ratesetting methodology.

(D) A procedure for adjusting rates as a result of anticipated and unanticipated program changes and fiscal audits of the program and a procedure for appealing rates, including the timeframes for the program to request an adjustment or appeal, and for the department to respond.

(E) A procedure for increasing established rates and the allowable range of rates due to cost-of-living adjustments.

(F) A procedure for increasing established rates as a result of Budget Act appropriations made pursuant to the ratesetting methodology established pursuant to Section 4691.5 and subdivision (c) of this section.

The department shall develop these regulations in consultation with representatives from organizations representing the developmental services system as determined by the department. The State Council on Developmental Disabilities, and other organizations representing regional centers, providers, and clients shall have an opportunity to review and comment upon the proposed regulations prior to their promulgation. The department shall promulgate these regulations for all community-based day programs by July 1, 1990.

(c) Upon the promulgation of regulations pursuant to subdivision (b), and pursuant to Section 4691.5, and by September 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall establish rates pursuant to the regulations. Rate increases during the 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal years shall be limited to those specified in subdivision (b). For the 1992–93 fiscal year and all succeeding fiscal years, any
 increases proposed during those years in the rates of reimbursement established pursuant to the regulations, except for rate increases due to rate appeals and rate adjustments based on unanticipated program changes, shall be subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds in the Budget Act, for those purposes, to fully provide the proposed increase to all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year. If the funds appropriated in the Budget Act are not sufficient to fully provide for the proposed increase in the rates of reimbursement for all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year, the proposed increase shall be limited to the level of funds appropriated. The increases proposed in the rates of reimbursement shall be reduced equitably among all eligible providers in accordance with funds appropriated and the eligible programs shall be reimbursed at the reduced amount for the entire fiscal year.

(d) Using the reported costs of day programs
 reimbursed at a permanent rate and the standards and ratesetting processes promulgated pursuant to subdivision (b) as a basis, the department shall report to the Legislature as follows:

(1) By April 15, 1993, and every odd year thereafter, the difference between permanent rates for existing programs and the rates of those programs based upon their allowable costs and client attendance, submitted pursuant to the regulations specified in subdivision (b). In reporting the difference, the department shall also identify the amount of the difference associated with programs whose rates are above the allowable range of rates, which is available for increasing the rates of programs whose rates are below the allowable range, to within the allowable range, and any other pertinent cost or rate information which the department deems necessary.

(2) By April 15, 1994, and every even year
 thereafter, the level of funding, if any, which was not appropriated to reimburse providers at the proposed rates reported the prior fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1), and any other pertinent cost or rate information which the department deems necessary.

(3) The April 15, 1996, report pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be prepared jointly by the department and organizations representing community-based day program providers, as determined by the department. That report shall also include a review of the ratesetting process and recommendations, if any, for its modification.

(e) Rates established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) are exempt from the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) The department shall ensure that the
 regional centers monitor compliance with program standards.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 40.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 41 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.

(a) The Legislature reaffirms its intent that community-based day programs be planned and provided as part of a continuum of services to enable persons with developmental disabilities to approximate the pattern of everyday living available to people of the same age without disabilities. The Legislature further intends that standards be developed to ensure high-quality services, and that equitable ratesetting procedures based upon those standards be established, maintained, and revised, as necessary. The Legislature intends that ratesetting procedures be developed for all community-based day programs, which include adult development centers, activity centers, infant day programs, behavior management programs, social recreational programs, and independent living programs.

(b) For the purpose of ensuring that regional centers may secure high-quality services for persons with developmental disabilities, the State Department of Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations establishing program standards and an equitable process for setting rates of state payment for community-based day programs. These regulations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The standards and requirements related to the operation of the program including, but not limited to, staff qualifications, staff-to-client ratios, client entrance and exit criteria, program design, program evaluation, program and client records and documentation, client placement, and personnel requirements and functions.

(2) The allowable cost components of the program, including salary and wages, staff
 benefits, operating expenses, and management organization costs in which two or more programs are operated by a separate and distinct corporation or entity.

(3) The rate determination processes for establishing rates, based on the allowable costs of the allowable cost components. Different rate determination processes may be developed for establishing rates for new and existing programs, and for the initial and subsequent years of implementation of the regulations. The processes shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The procedure for identification and grouping of programs by type of day program and approved staff-to-client ratio.

(B) The requirements for an identification of the program, cost, and other information, if any, that the program is required to submit to the department or the
 regional center, the consequences, if any, for failure to do so, and the timeframes and format for submission and review.

(C) The ratesetting methodology.

(D) A procedure for adjusting rates as a result of anticipated and unanticipated program changes and fiscal audits of the program and a procedure for appealing rates, including the timeframes for the program to request an adjustment or appeal, and for the department to respond.

(E) A procedure for increasing established rates and the allowable range of rates due to cost-of-living adjustments.

(F) A procedure for increasing established rates as a result of Budget Act appropriations made pursuant to the ratesetting methodology established pursuant to Section 4691.5 and subdivision (c) of this
 section.

The department shall develop these regulations in consultation with representatives from organizations representing the developmental services system as determined by the department. The State Council on Developmental Disabilities, and other organizations representing regional centers, providers, and clients shall have an opportunity to review and comment upon the proposed regulations prior to their promulgation. The department shall promulgate these regulations for all community-based day programs by July 1, 1990.

(c) Upon the promulgation of regulations pursuant to subdivision (b), and pursuant to Section 4691.5, and by September 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall establish rates pursuant to the regulations. Rate increases during the 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal years shall be limited to those specified in subdivision (b). For the 1992–93 fiscal year and all succeeding fiscal
 years, any increases proposed during those years in the rates of reimbursement established pursuant to the regulations, except for rate increases due to rate appeals and rate adjustments based on unanticipated program changes, shall be subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds in the Budget Act, for those purposes, to fully provide the proposed increase to all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year. If the funds appropriated in the Budget Act are not sufficient to fully provide for the proposed increase in the rates of reimbursement for all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year, the proposed increase shall be limited to the level of funds appropriated. The increases proposed in the rates of reimbursement shall be reduced equitably among all eligible providers in accordance with funds appropriated and the eligible programs shall be reimbursed at the reduced amount for the entire fiscal year.

(d) Rates established by the
 department pursuant to subdivision (b) are exempt from the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) The department shall ensure that the regional centers monitor compliance with program standards.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 40) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 41.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.5.

The ratesetting methodology, to be established pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 4691 shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A process for establishing rates during fiscal year 1990–91 for new programs and existing programs receiving a provisional or permanent rate.

(1) The rate for new programs shall be the mean rate determined for the same type of day program and staff-to-client ratio. This rate shall be a temporary rate. Determination of the mean rate for new programs shall be based on the program, cost, and other information of existing programs receiving a permanent rate, using allowable costs and client attendance information of those existing programs. In order to establish rates pursuant to this paragraph existing programs receiving a permanent rate shall submit to the department, the program, cost, and other information specified by the department for either calendar year 1988 or fiscal year 1988–89. The specified information shall be submitted on forms developed by the department, not later than 45 days following receipt of the required forms from the department, after the effective date of this section. Programs which fail to submit the required information within the time specified shall have payment of their permanent rate suspended until the required information has been submitted.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4) the rate for existing programs receiving a provisional rate, whose rate would otherwise expire during fiscal year 1990–91, shall be extended at the provisional rate until September 1, 1991.

(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) below, the rate for existing programs receiving a permanent rate shall be reestablished at the permanent rate until June 30, 1991.
